Utah statutes.
63G-6a-2002.   Records -- Retention.

(1)  All procurement records shall be retained and disposed of in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.

(2)  Written determinations required by this chapter shall be retained in the appropriate official contract file of:

(a)  the division;

(b)  the procurement unit with independent procurement authority; or

(c)  for a legislative procurement unit or a judicial procurement unit, the person designated by rule made by the applicable rulemaking authority.

(3)  A procurement unit shall keep, and make available to the public, upon request, written records of procurements for which an expenditure of $50 or more is made, for the longer of:

(a)  four years;

(b)  the time otherwise required by law; or

(c)  the time period provided by rule made by the applicable rulemaking authority.

(4)  The written record described in Subsection (3) shall include:

(a)  the name of the provider from whom the procurement was made;

(b)  a description of the procurement item;

(c)  the date of the procurement; and

(d)  the expenditure made for the procurement.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

